Nebraska, session 109, LB790.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB790 LB790
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 83-1,119, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
83-1,119 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Absconding parole supervision means a parolee has purposely
avoided supervision for a period of at least two weeks and reasonable
efforts by a parole officer and staff to locate the parolee in person
have proven unsuccessful;
(b) Administrative sanction means additional parole requirements
imposed upon a parolee by his or her parole officer, with the full
knowledge and consent of the parolee, designed to hold the parolee
accountable for substance abuse or technical violations of conditions of
parole, including, but not limited to:
(i) Counseling or reprimand by the department;
(ii) Increased supervision contact requirements;
(iii) Increased substance abuse testing;
(iv) Referral for substance abuse or mental health evaluation or
other specialized assessment, counseling, or treatment;
(v) Imposition of a designated curfew for a period to be determined
by the department; and
(vi) Travel restrictions to stay within his or her county of
residence or employment unless otherwise permitted by the department;
(c) Contract facility means a county jail that contracts with the
department to house parolees or other offenders under the jurisdiction of
the department;
(d) Substance abuse violation means a parolee's activities or
behaviors associated with the use of chemical substances or related
treatment services resulting in a violation of an original condition of
parole, including:
(i) Positive breath test for the consumption of alcohol if the
parolee is required to refrain from alcohol consumption;
(ii) Positive urinalysis for the illegal use of drugs;
-2-

LB790 LB790
2026 2026
(iii) Failure to report for alcohol testing or drug testing; and
(iv) Failure to appear for or complete substance abuse or mental
health treatment evaluations or inpatient or outpatient treatment; and
(e) Technical violation means a parolee's activities or behaviors
which create the opportunity for re-offending or diminish the
effectiveness of parole supervision resulting in a violation of an
original condition of parole and includes:
(i) Moving traffic violations;
(ii) Failure to report to his or her parole officer;
(iii) Leaving the state without the permission of the Board of
Parole;
(iv) Failure to work regularly or attend training or school;
(v) Failure to notify his or her parole officer of change of address
or employment;
(vi) Frequenting places where controlled substances are illegally
sold, used, distributed, or administered; and
(vii) Failure to pay fines, court costs, restitution, or any fees
imposed pursuant to section 83-1,107.01 as directed.
Technical violation does not include absconding parole supervision.
(2) The department shall develop a matrix of rewards for compliance
and positive behaviors and graduated administrative sanctions and
custodial sanctions for use in responding to and deterring substance
abuse violations and technical violations. A custodial sanction of thirty
days in a correctional facility or a contract facility shall be
designated as the most severe response to a violation in lieu of
revocation.
(3) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
parolee has committed or is about to commit a substance abuse violation
or technical violation while on parole, but that the parolee will not
attempt to leave the jurisdiction and will not place lives or property in
danger, the parole officer shall either:
-3-

LB790 LB790
2026 2026
(a) Impose one or more administrative sanctions based upon the
parolee's risk level, the severity of the violation, and the parolee's
response to the violation. If administrative sanctions are to be imposed,
the parolee shall acknowledge in writing the nature of the violation and
agree upon the administrative sanction. The parolee has the right to
decline to acknowledge the violation. If he or she declines to
acknowledge the violation, the parole officer shall take action pursuant
to subdivision (3)(b) of this section. A copy of the report shall be
submitted to the Board of Parole; or
(b) Submit a written report to the Board of Parole, outlining the
nature of the parole violation, and request the imposition of a custodial
sanction of up to thirty days in a correctional facility or a contract
facility. On the basis of the report and such further investigation as
the board may deem appropriate, the board shall determine whether and how
the parolee violated the conditions of parole and may:
(i) Dismiss the charge of violation; or
(ii) If the board finds a violation justifying a custodial sanction,
issue a warrant if necessary and impose a custodial sanction of up to
thirty days in a correctional facility or a contract facility.
(4) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
parolee has committed or is about to commit a substance abuse violation
while on parole, but that the parolee will not attempt to leave the
jurisdiction and will not place lives or property in danger, the parole
officer shall either:
(a) Impose one or more administrative sanctions based upon the
parolee's risk level, the severity of the violation, and the parolee's
response to the violation. If administrative sanctions are to be imposed,
the parolee shall acknowledge in writing the nature of the violation and
agree upon the administrative sanction. The parolee has the right to
decline to acknowledge the violation. If he or she declines to
acknowledge the violation, the parole officer shall take action pursuant
-4-

LB790 LB790
2026 2026
to subdivision (4)(b) of this section. A copy of the report shall be
submitted to the Board of Parole; or
(b) Submit a written report to the Board of Parole which may, on the
basis of such report and such further investigation as it may deem
appropriate:
(i) Dismiss the violation;
(ii) Determine whether the parolee violated the conditions of his or
her parole;
(iii) Impose a custodial sanction of up to thirty days in a
correctional facility or a contract facility;
(iv) Revoke his or her parole in accordance with the Nebraska
Treatment and Corrections Act; or
(v) Issue a warrant for the arrest of the parolee.
(5) (4) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a parolee has violated or is about to violate a condition of parole
by a violation other than a substance abuse violation or a technical
violation and the parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that the
parolee will not attempt to leave the jurisdiction and will not place
lives or property in danger, the parole officer shall submit a written
report to the Board of Parole which may, on the basis of such report and
such further investigation as it may deem appropriate:
(a) Dismiss the charge of violation;
(b) Determine whether the parolee violated the conditions of his or
her parole;
(c) Impose a custodial sanction of up to thirty days in a
correctional facility or a contract facility;
(d) Revoke his or her parole in accordance with the Nebraska
Treatment and Corrections Act; or
(e) Issue a warrant for the arrest of the parolee.
(6) (5) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a parolee has violated or is about to violate a condition of parole
-5-

LB790 LB790
2026 2026
and that the parolee will attempt to leave the jurisdiction or will place
lives or property in danger, the parole officer shall arrest the parolee
without a warrant and call on any peace officer to assist him or her in
doing so.
(7) (6) Whenever a parolee is arrested with or without a warrant, he
or she shall be detained in a local jail or other detention facility
operated by the department pending completion of review of parole
proceedings by the Board of Parole. Immediately after such arrest and
detention, the parole officer shall notify the Board of Parole and submit
a written report of the reason for such arrest. A complete investigation
shall be made by the department and submitted to the board. After prompt
consideration of such written report, the board shall order the parolee's
release from detention or continued confinement to await a final decision
on imposition of a custodial sanction or the revocation of parole.
(8) (7) The Board of Parole shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 83-1,119, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-6-